Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-801
Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-801 to 71-830 and the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 91;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB603, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB1158, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB1158, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB276, § 1.

Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Act, see section 71-832.